New York, session 2025-2026, S803.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing the 2 town of Southampton, county of Suffolk, to enact by a local law a home- 3 stead exemption, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2094-A and 4 A. 3872-A, is amended to read as follows: 5 Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, [the] 6 a town [of Southampton, county of Suffolk] with a population between 7 69,000 and 69,500 as of the 2020 decennial census may enact by local law 8 a homestead exemption from real property [taxation] taxes levied by such 9 town as provided herein. Eligibility for such homestead exemption shall 10 be the same as for the basic school tax relief (STAR) exemption pursuant 11 to subdivision 3 of section 425 of the real property tax law. The 12 exemption shall be uniform for all eligible real property and shall not 13 exceed $50,000 in full [assessed] value. The exemption shall be granted 14 only upon application by the owner of such building, on a form 15 prescribed by the commissioner of taxation and finance, filed with the 16 town assessor on or before the taxable status date of such town. 17 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing the town 18 of Southampton, county of Suffolk, to enact by a local law a homestead 19 exemption, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2094-A and A. 20 3872-A, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02805-01-5 S. 803 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to assess- 2 ment rolls based on taxable status dates occurring on or after such 3 effective date. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 5 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 6 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 authorizing the town of 7 Southampton, county of Suffolk, to enact by a local law a homestead 8 exemption, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 2094-A and A. 9 3872-A, takes effect.